Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.220

Expense of printing and mailing ballots, envelopes, and instructions.

The cost of printing and mailing ballots, envelopes, and instructions shall be an election cost that shall be borne as determined under RCW 29A.04.410 and 29A.04.420, as appropriate.

[ 2011 c 10 s 34; 2003 c 111 s 922. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 16; 1965 c 9 s 29.30.130; prior: 1889 p 400 s 1; RRS s 5269. Formerly RCW 29.30.130.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.